Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4130.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: ARTICLE 1 OFFICE OF THE INSPECTOR GENERAL Section 1. new text begin [15E.10] OFFICE OF THE INSPECTOR GENERAL. new text end new text begin (a) The inspector general serves as an independent entity in the executive branch responsible for ensuring accountability, transparency, and integrity in the operations of state agencies and programs. new text end new text begin (b) In exercising the inspector general's powers and duties, the inspector general must operate independently of all other state executive branch agencies and report directly to the governor. Except as provided by law, the inspector general is not subject to direction or interference from any executive or legislative authority. new text end new text begin (c) The inspector general shall direct an Office of the Inspector General. new text end new text begin (d) The inspector general serves in the unclassified service. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [15E.15] DEFINITIONS. new text end new text begin For purposes of this chapter, the following terms have the meanings given: new text end new text begin (1) "agency program" means a program funded or administered by a state department or agency, including grants and contracts; new text end new text begin (2) "fraud" means an intentional or deceptive act, or failure to act, to gain an unlawful benefit; new text end new text begin (3) "investigation" means a review or inquiry conducted by the inspector general to detect or prevent fraud or misuse; new text end new text begin (4) "misuse" means improper use of authority or position for personal gain or to cause harm to others, including the improper use of public resources or programs contrary to their intended purpose; new text end new text begin (5) "person" means a natural person, partnership, corporation, association, or other legal entity; and new text end new text begin (6) "personal gain" means a benefit to a person; to a person's spouse, parent, child, or other legal dependent; or to an in-law of the person or the person's child. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin [15E.20] INSPECTOR GENERAL. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Minimum qualifications. new text end new text begin (a) To be eligible to be appointed as inspector general, a candidate must: new text end new text begin (1) have a bachelor's degree or higher in criminal justice, public administration, law, or a related field; new text end new text begin (2) have at least ten years of professional experience in auditing, investigations, law enforcement, or a related area; new text end new text begin (3) hold, or acquire within 15 months of appointment, a professional certificate from the Association of Inspectors General, including Certified Inspector General or Certified Inspector General Investigator; and new text end new text begin (4) demonstrate a commitment to safeguarding the mission of public service and provide a public disclosure of prior professional opinions, positions, or actions that may influence the candidate's approach to the role. new text end new text begin (b) Current or former commissioners, agency heads, deputy commissioners or agency heads, governors, or legislators are not eligible to serve as inspector general within five years of their service in those roles. A person elected to an office other than governor or legislator is not eligible until ten years after the end of service in an elected position. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Appointment. new text end new text begin The Legislative Inspector General Advisory Commission must recommend candidates for inspector general after a competitive process from among eligible applicants for the position of inspector general. To be recommended by the commission, a candidate must be approved for recommendation by five of the eight members of the commission. The commission must assess eligible candidates based on qualifications, including experience in auditing, financial analysis, public administration, law enforcement, or related fields. The inspector general is appointed by the governor, after consideration of recommendations from the Legislative Inspector General Advisory Commission, with confirmation by a vote of three-fifths of the senate. Section 15.066, subdivision 3, does not apply. The governor may appoint a qualified applicant who was not recommended by the commission. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Term. new text end new text begin The inspector general serves a five-year term and may be appointed to unlimited additional terms. An appointment to an additional term must be confirmed by a vote of three-fifths of the senate. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Vacancy. new text end new text begin The Legislative Inspector General Advisory Commission must provide recommendations to the governor for appointment to fill a vacancy in the position of the inspector general within 90 days of a vacancy occurring or within 60 days of being advised by the inspector general that a vacancy is expected to occur. The governor must appoint an inspector general within 30 days of receiving recommendations from the Legislative Inspector General Advisory Commission or within 45 days of expiration of the 90-day or 60-day period if the advisory commission does not provide recommendations within the time allotted. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Disclosure. new text end new text begin A candidate considered by the Legislative Inspector General Advisory Commission or selected for appointment by the governor must disclose all political affiliations, appointments, campaign work, or partisan activities prior to confirmation. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Nonpartisanship. new text end new text begin The inspector general and all employees of the office must perform duties of the office without regard to partisan preferences or influences. While serving, the inspector general and all employees of the office may not engage in partisan activities, campaign work, or public political speech, unless protected by the state or federal constitution. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Removal. new text end new text begin The inspector general may only be removed by the governor before the expiration of the term for cause after a public hearing conducted by the governor and with the approval of three-fifths of the senate and three-fifths of the house of representatives. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin [15E.25] DUTIES AND POWERS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Duties. new text end new text begin The inspector general must: new text end new text begin (1) establish standards and best practices concerning the operation, investigations, and fraud prevention processes of agency inspectors general and periodically review agency compliance with these standards and best practices. Agencies must follow standards developed by the inspector general under this clause; new text end new text begin (2) support the work of agency inspectors general, as well as program integrity staff in those agencies that do not have an agency inspector general. The inspector general may conduct an inspection at the request of an agency, with priority given to agencies that do not have an agency inspector general; new text end new text begin (3) facilitate information sharing between agencies, including coordinating investigations that involve multiple agencies and designating a lead agency, coordinating and assisting agency identification and review of suspicious documents and data anomalies, and alerting other agencies when a person suspected of committing fraud against any agency program may also be participating in, or applying to participate in, a program administered by another agency; new text end new text begin (4) evaluate the performance of agency inspectors general and recommend improvements, as needed, to the agency's commissioner or agency head and inspector general. A commissioner or head that receives a recommendation under this clause must report annually to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over the agency regarding the agency's implementation of the inspector general's recommendations until the inspector general notifies the agency's commissioner or agency head and the chairs and ranking minority members that the recommendation was resolved in a satisfactory manner; new text end new text begin (5) establish appropriate prepayment review procedures for all agencies; new text end new text begin (6) investigate, at the inspector general's discretion, any public or private entity that receives public funds to ensure compliance with applicable laws, proper use of funds, and adherence to program requirements; new text end new text begin (7) conduct inspections, evaluations, and investigations of state executive branch agencies, with a focus on publicly funded programs and services, to: (i) identify fraud and misuse; (ii) recommend changes to programs to prevent fraud and misuse; and (iii) protect the integrity of the use of public funds, data, and systems; new text end new text begin (8) refer matters for civil, criminal, or administrative action to the Bureau of Criminal Apprehension, the Office of the Attorney General, or other appropriate authorities; new text end new text begin (9) recommend legislative or policy changes to improve program oversight; new text end new text begin (10) publish reports upon completion of an investigation summarizing findings, recommendations, and outcomes of the inspector general's activities; new text end new text begin (11) submit an annual report summarizing the work of the office to the Legislative Inspector General Advisory Commission and make the report publicly available by posting the report on the inspector general's website; new text end new text begin (12) alert relevant commissioners or agency heads when the inspector general has a credible allegation that fraud or misuse is being committed, whether or not the inspector general is conducting an investigation, as provided in subdivision 3; and new text end new text begin (13) establish and maintain a current exclusion list, in a format readily accessible to agencies, that identifies each program and individual for which the inspector general has obtained a court order to freeze or cease distribution of funds or made a recommendation under clause (12) to freeze or cease distribution of funds. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Relationship to powers and duties of other agencies. new text end new text begin (a) The inspector general has authority to investigate fraud and misuse of public funds across all programs administered by state agencies. The inspector general may direct and evaluate an agency's review or inquiry when the review or inquiry concerns suspected fraud or misuse. new text end new text begin (b) The inspector general may perform the inspector general's duties and apply the inspector general's authority without obtaining approval from another agency. new text end new text begin (c) The Department of Human Services has primary responsibility to investigate fraud in the Medicaid program, but the inspector general has authority to conduct independent investigations related to the Medicaid program as necessary. new text end new text begin (d) The Department of Children, Youth, and Families has primary responsibility to investigate fraud in the child care assistance program and the great start compensation support payment program, but the inspector general has authority to conduct independent investigations related to the child care assistance program and the great start compensation support payment program. new text end new text begin (e) The Department of Health has primary responsibility to investigate fraud related to women, infants, and children (WIC) and food support programs, but the inspector general has authority to conduct independent investigations related to WIC and food support programs. new text end new text begin (f) The inspector general must refer all credible reports from the public about potential fraud or misuse to the legislative auditor, and to the commissioner of human services for reports related to Medicaid. The inspector general may coordinate investigations with the legislative auditor, and the commissioner of human services for investigations related to Medicaid, when coordination conserves resources and does not compromise an investigation. new text end new text begin (g) The Department of Information Technology Services shall provide services to the Office of the Inspector General under a managed services contract according to section 16E.016. new text end new text begin (h) The commissioner or head of an agency with its own inspector general must obtain written approval from the inspector general appointed under section 15E.20 before discharging, demoting, or otherwise removing an individual from the position. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Alerting agency of issue; seeking a court order to freeze funds. new text end new text begin (a) If the agency does not have primary investigative authority under subdivision 2, the inspector general shall investigate. If the inspector general has a credible allegation that fraud or misuse is occurring, the inspector general may, at the inspector general's discretion, alert the commissioner or agency head and seek a court order to freeze or cease distribution of public funds, including any applicable due process and appeal rights. The inspector general may work in cooperation with the agency when practical and when it would not jeopardize an investigation. new text end new text begin (b) If the agency has primary investigative authority under subdivision 2, but the inspector general is not satisfied that the agency's internal investigation is adequate or proceeding quickly enough, the inspector general may independently investigate. If the inspector general has a credible allegation that fraud or misuse is being committed, the inspector general may make a recommendation to the agency to freeze or cease distribution of funds and notify the appropriate law enforcement agencies. new text end new text begin (c) If a commissioner or agency head does not act on a recommendation to freeze or cease distribution of funds as requested, after reasonable notice and consistent with any applicable interagency agreements under section 15, unless prohibited by federal requirements, the inspector general may, at the inspector general's discretion, seek a court order to freeze or cease distribution of public funds, consistent with applicable due process and appeal rights. new text end new text begin (d) If public funds cease or are frozen pursuant to this subdivision, the inspector general, working with and through the applicable state agency, must ensure that any person whose support from public funds is interrupted and who is not implicated in the suspected fraud or misuse receives notice of the person's rights related to continued receipt of the public funds, services, or programs for which the person is eligible. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Exceptions for federal funding. new text end new text begin The inspector general must not comply with any provision under this section if compliance with the provision would prevent the state from receiving federal financial participation for the medical assistance program or result in a lower level of coverage or reduced access to coverage for medical assistance enrollees. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin Subdivisions 2, paragraph (c), and 3, paragraphs (b) and (c), are effective January 1, 2027, or upon federal approval from the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, whichever is later. The commissioner of human services must notify the revisor of statutes when the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services approve or deny this section. The remainder of this section is effective January 1, 2027. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin [15E.30] AUXILIARY POWERS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Subpoena power. new text end new text begin In all matters relating to official duties, the inspector general has the powers possessed by courts of law to issue and have subpoenas served. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Inquiry and inspection power; duty to aid inspector general. new text end new text begin All public officials and their deputies and employees, and all corporations, firms, and individuals having business involving the receipt, disbursement, or custody of public funds, shall at all times: new text end new text begin (1) afford reasonable facilities for examinations by the inspector general; new text end new text begin (2) provide returns and reports required by the inspector general; new text end new text begin (3) attend and answer under oath the inspector general's lawful inquiries; new text end new text begin (4) produce and exhibit all books, accounts, documents, data of any classification, and property that the inspector general requests to inspect; and new text end new text begin (5) in all things cooperate with the inspector general. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Penalties. new text end new text begin (a) If a person refuses or neglects to obey any lawful direction of the inspector general or the inspector general's deputy or assistant, or withholds any information, book, record, paper, or other document called for by the inspector general for the purpose of examination, after having been lawfully required by order or subpoena, upon application by the inspector general, a judge of the district court in the county where the order or subpoena was made returnable shall compel obedience or punish disobedience as for contempt, as in the case of a similar order or subpoena issued by the court. new text end new text begin (b) A person who swears falsely concerning any matter stated under oath is guilty of a gross misdemeanor. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027. new text end Sec. 6. new text begin [15E.35] IDENTIFICATION OF FRAUD REPORTING TOOL. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner or head of each executive branch agency must prominently highlight on the agency's website the fraud reporting tools administered by the Office of the Inspector General under this chapter and by the Office of the Legislative Auditor under chapter 3. new text end new text begin (b) As part of any grant agreement between the state and a nonprofit organization, the agreement must require the nonprofit organization to prominently highlight on the organization's website the fraud reporting tools administered by the Office of the Inspector General under this chapter and by the Office of the Legislative Auditor under chapter 3. The state agency administering the grant must regularly confirm and document the organization's compliance with the requirement under this paragraph for the life of the grant agreement. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027. new text end Sec. 7. new text begin [15E.40] DATA PRACTICES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Confidential data on individuals" has the meaning given in section 13.02, subdivision 3. new text end new text begin (c) "Government entity" has the meaning given in section 13.02, subdivision 7a. new text end new text begin (d) "Nonpublic data" has the meaning given in section 13.02, subdivision 9. new text end new text begin (e) "Not public data" has the meaning given in section 13.02, subdivision 8a. new text end new text begin (f) "Private data on individuals" has the meaning given in section 13.02, subdivision 12. new text end new text begin (g) "Protected nonpublic data" has the meaning given in section 13.02, subdivision 13. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Government Data Practices Act. new text end new text begin The Office of the Inspector General is a government entity and is subject to the Government Data Practices Act, chapter 13. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Access. new text end new text begin In order to perform the duties under this chapter, the Office of the Inspector General has access to data of any classification, including data classified as not public data. It is not a violation of chapter 13 or any other statute classifying government data as not public data if a government entity provides data pursuant to a subpoena issued under this chapter. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Dissemination. new text end new text begin The inspector general may disseminate data of any classification, including not public data, to: new text end new text begin (1) a government entity, other than a law enforcement agency or prosecuting authority, if the dissemination of the data aids a pending investigation or administrative action; new text end new text begin (2) a law enforcement agency or prosecuting authority if there is reason to believe that the data are evidence of criminal activity within the agency's or authority's jurisdiction; new text end new text begin (3) the legislative auditor; or new text end new text begin (4) the commissioner of human services as provided in section 15E.25, subdivision 2, paragraph (f). new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Data classifications; civil investigations. new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding any other law, data relating to a civil investigation conducted under this chapter are confidential data on individuals or protected nonpublic data while the investigation is active. Whether a civil investigation is active shall be determined by the inspector general. new text end new text begin (b) Data relating to a civil investigation conducted under this chapter become public data upon the inspector general's completion of the investigation, unless: new text end new text begin (1) the release of the data would jeopardize another active investigation by the Office of the Inspector General or another government entity; new text end new text begin (2) the inspector general reasonably believes the data will be used in litigation related to any civil, criminal, or administrative actions, including reconsideration or appeal of any such action; or new text end new text begin (3) the data are classified as not public under another statute or paragraph (e). new text end new text begin (c) Data subject to paragraph (b), clause (2), are confidential data on individuals or protected nonpublic data and become public when the litigation has been completed or the time period to appeal has expired or when the litigation is no longer being actively pursued. new text end new text begin (d) Unless the data are subject to a more restrictive classification, upon the inspector general's decision to no longer actively pursue a civil investigation under this chapter, data relating to a civil investigation are private data on individuals or nonpublic data, except the following data are public: new text end new text begin (1) data relating to the investigation's general description, existence, status, and disposition; and new text end new text begin (2) data that document the inspector general's work. new text end new text begin (e) Inactive civil investigative data on an individual supplying information for an investigation that could reasonably be used to determine the individual's identity are private data on individuals if the information supplied was needed for the investigation and would not have been provided to the inspector general without an assurance to the individual that the individual's identity would remain private. new text end new text begin (f) Data relating to a civil investigation conducted under this chapter that are obtained from an entity that is not a government entity have the same classification that the data would have if obtained from a government entity. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Privileges. new text end new text begin Nothing in this section or section 15E.30 requires the disclosure of documents or information that is legally privileged under statute or other law, including documents or information subject to section 13.393 or 595.02. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027. new text end Sec. 8. new text begin [15E.45] RESOURCES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Staff. new text end new text begin The inspector general may hire and manage staff as necessary and in accordance with chapter 43A. The inspector general must employ and manage at least one attorney to serve as legal counsel for the office and to advise the inspector general on all legal matters relating to the office. Except for the inspector general, the staff in the Office of the Inspector General serve in the classified civil service. Compensation for employees of the inspector general in the classified service who are represented by an exclusive representative is governed by a collective bargaining agreement negotiated between the commissioner of management and budget and the exclusive representative. Compensation for employees of the inspector general in the classified service who are not represented by an exclusive representative is as provided in the nonrepresented employees compensation plan under section 43A.18, subdivision 2, or the managerial plan under section 43A.18, subdivision 3, depending on the employee's job classification. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Contracting. new text end new text begin The inspector general may contract with external experts to support the work of the office, subject to section 16C.08. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027. new text end Sec. 9. new text begin [15E.50] REPORTING AND TRANSPARENCY. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Reports. new text end new text begin The inspector general must issue public reports detailing completed investigations and any corrective actions taken. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Public tips. new text end new text begin The inspector general must maintain a telephone line and website for reporting fraud and misuse that allow the person making the report to remain anonymous. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Report; inactive investigations. new text end new text begin By December 1, 2027, and each December 1 thereafter, the inspector general must submit a report to the legislative auditor and the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over state government and data practices regarding all investigations the inspector general did not open after receiving a tip or complaint or decided to no longer actively pursue for the preceding calendar year. The report must include, at a minimum, summary data as defined in section 13.02, subdivision 19, for: new text end new text begin (1) all complaints or tips received; new text end new text begin (2) the type of allegation; new text end new text begin (3) if the complaint or tip was not frivolous, the reason the inspector general did not open an investigation or decided to no longer pursue the investigation; and new text end new text begin (4) referrals to other agencies or the legislative auditor. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027. new text end Sec. 10. new text begin [15E.55] PROFESSIONAL STANDARDS AND REVIEW. new text end new text begin (a) The inspector general's activities must adhere to professional standards as promulgated by the Association of Inspectors General or other recognized bodies. new text end new text begin (b) The governor may contract for an external quality assurance review of the inspector general every three years and must make findings from the review public. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027. new text end Sec. 11. new text begin [15E.60] LEGISLATIVE INSPECTOR GENERAL ADVISORY COMMISSION. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Membership. new text end new text begin The Legislative Inspector General Advisory Commission is comprised of: new text end new text begin (1) two senators appointed by the majority leader of the senate; new text end new text begin (2) two senators appointed by the minority leader of the senate; new text end new text begin (3) two members of the house of representatives appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives; and new text end new text begin (4) two members of the house of representatives appointed by the minority leader of the house of representatives. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Terms. new text end new text begin Members serve at the pleasure of their appointing authority and each member serves until a replacement is appointed. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Chair. new text end new text begin The commission must select a chair after consideration of its members by January 31 of each odd-numbered year. The chair serves until a successor is elected. The chair must alternate biennially between the senate and the house of representatives. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Duties. new text end new text begin The Legislative Inspector General Advisory Commission: new text end new text begin (1) must consider applicants for and make recommendations to the governor for the position of inspector general; and new text end new text begin (2) may conduct hearings to review the work of the inspector general to ensure impartiality, independence, and effectiveness. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Per diem; expense reimbursement. new text end new text begin Members may be compensated for time spent on commission duties and may be reimbursed for expenses according to the rules of their respective bodies. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Meeting space; staff. new text end new text begin The Legislative Coordinating Commission must provide meeting space and staff to assist the commission in performing its duties. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Open meetings. new text end new text begin The Legislative Inspector General Advisory Commission is subject to the requirements in section 3.055. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 12. new text begin [15E.65] INSPECTOR GENERAL COORDINATING COMMITTEE. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Establishment; purpose. new text end new text begin The Inspector General Coordinating Committee is established to coordinate and strengthen the work of executive branch agencies in safeguarding public resources through effective and efficient program integrity, auditing, internal control, and related functions. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Membership. new text end new text begin The Inspector General Coordinating Committee consists of the following members: new text end new text begin (1) the inspector general appointed under this chapter, who serves as chair; new text end new text begin (2) the commissioner, or the commissioner's designee, of each agency that has an agency inspector general whether by law or commissioner's order; new text end new text begin (3) the superintendent of the Bureau of Criminal Apprehension in the Department of Public Safety, or the superintendent's designee; new text end new text begin (4) the commissioner of administration, or the commissioner's designee, representing the Office of Grants Management in the Department of Administration; and new text end new text begin (5) the commissioner of management and budget, or the commissioner's designee, representing the Internal Controls and Accountability Unit in the Department of Management and Budget. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Duties. new text end new text begin The Inspector General Coordinating Committee must: new text end new text begin (1) meet monthly to share investigative data, trends, and other information to better prevent, detect, and investigate fraud and misuse in agency programs; new text end new text begin (2) assist the inspector general in the development of data sharing methods, investigative best practices, and program integrity review processes for agency programs; and new text end new text begin (3) assist agencies in securing specialized internal audits, investigations, or other necessary skills and tools. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027. new text end Sec. 13. new text begin OFFICE OF THE INSPECTOR GENERAL ESTABLISHMENT.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appointment. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 15E.20, subdivision 4, by January 1, 2027, the Legislative Inspector General Advisory Commission must make recommendations for appointment of an inspector general under Minnesota Statutes, section 15E.20. The governor must appoint an inspector general by February 1, 2027, unless the Legislative Inspector General Advisory Commission does not recommend any candidates by January 1, 2027, in which case the governor must appoint an inspector general by February 15, 2027. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Operational. new text end new text begin By September 1, 2027, the Office of the Inspector General must be fully operational. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Office space. new text end new text begin The commissioner of administration must provide office space for the Office of the Inspector General under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 15E, under a rental agreement. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 14. new text begin LEGISLATIVE INSPECTOR GENERAL ADVISORY COMMISSION; INITIAL APPOINTMENTS AND FIRST MEETING.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Initial appointments. new text end new text begin Appointing authorities must make appointments to the Legislative Inspector General Advisory Commission by August 1, 2026. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin First meeting. new text end new text begin The senate majority leader must designate one member of the Legislative Inspector General Advisory Commission to convene the first meeting of the Legislative Inspector General Advisory Commission by September 15, 2026. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Chair. new text end new text begin The Legislative Inspector General Advisory Commission must elect a chair from among its senate members at its first meeting. The first chair shall serve until a successor is selected at the start of the next biennium as provided in Minnesota Statutes, section 15E.60, subdivision 3. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 15. new text begin INTERAGENCY AGREEMENTS.new text end new text begin (a) By December 31, 2027, the Office of the Inspector General must enter into an interagency agreement with the Department of Human Services. The agreement must not preclude the agency from performing, or give the inspector general authority to take actions that would interfere with the agency's ability to perform, duties required as a condition for securing or maintaining federal funding. The interagency agreement must include a clause on cost sharing for investigations that may require multiagency coordination and a clause that details what process must be followed if a joint investigation is required. The interagency agreement must not limit the inspector general's authority or authorized powers and responsibilities. The agency and the inspector general may coordinate investigative efforts as necessary or practical, but an interagency agreement must not diminish, delay, or restrict the inspector general's ability to investigate fraud and misuse when an independent investigation is pursued. new text end new text begin (b) By December 31, 2027, the Office of the Inspector General must enter into an interagency agreement with the Department of Children, Youth, and Families. The interagency agreement must include a clause on cost sharing for investigations that may require multiagency coordination and a clause that details what process must be followed if a joint investigation is required. The interagency agreement must not limit the inspector general's authority or authorized powers and responsibilities. The agency and the inspector general may coordinate investigative efforts as necessary or practical, but an interagency agreement must not diminish, delay, or restrict the inspector general's ability to investigate fraud and misuse when an independent investigation is pursued. new text end new text begin (c) By December 31, 2027, the Office of the Inspector General must enter into an interagency agreement with the Department of Health. The interagency agreement must include a clause on cost sharing for investigations that may require multiagency coordination and a clause that details what process must be followed if a joint investigation is required. The interagency agreement must not limit the inspector general's authority or authorized powers and responsibilities. The agency and the inspector general may coordinate investigative efforts as necessary or practical, but an interagency agreement must not diminish, delay, or restrict the inspector general's ability to investigate fraud and misuse when an independent investigation is pursued. new text end new text begin (d) By December 31, 2027, the Office of the Inspector General must enter into an interagency agreement with the Department of Education. The interagency agreement must include a clause on cost sharing for investigations that may require multiagency coordination and a clause that details what process must be followed if a joint investigation is required. The interagency agreement must not limit the inspector general's authority or authorized powers and responsibilities. The agency and the inspector general may coordinate investigative efforts as necessary or practical, but an interagency agreement must not diminish, delay, or restrict the inspector general's ability to investigate fraud and misuse when an independent investigation is pursued. Nothing in Minnesota Statutes, chapter 15E, authorizes any sanction by the commissioner of education or inspector general that reduces, pauses, or otherwise interrupts state or federal aid to a school district; charter school; cooperative unit as defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 123A.24, subdivision 2; or any library, library system, or library district defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 134.001. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin Paragraph (a) is effective January 1, 2027, or upon federal approval from the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, whichever is later. The commissioner of human services must notify the revisor of statutes when the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services approve or deny this section. The remainder of this section is effective January 1, 2027. new text end Sec. 16. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS.new text end new text begin (a) $859,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of administration to establish the Office of the Inspector General. The base for this appropriation is $859,000 in fiscal year 2028 and $0 in fiscal year 2029 and each fiscal year thereafter. new text end new text begin (b) $229,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of children, youth, and families to coordinate with the Office of the Inspector General as required under this act. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2028. The base for this appropriation is $246,000 in fiscal year 2029 and each fiscal year thereafter. new text end new text begin (c) $487,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of health to coordinate with the Office of the Inspector General as required under this act. new text end new text begin (d) $467,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of human services to coordinate with the Office of the Inspector General as required under this act. The base for this appropriation is $542,000 in fiscal year 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter. new text end new text begin (e) $21,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the executive director of the Legislative Coordinating Commission to support the Legislative Inspector General Advisory Commission. The base for this appropriation is $7,000 in fiscal year 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter. new text end new text begin (f) $3,034,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the Office of the Inspector General for purposes of this act. The base for this appropriation is $6,432,000 in fiscal year 2028 and $6,439,000 in fiscal year 2029. The commissioner of administration, in consultation with the commissioner of management and budget, may transfer amounts in fiscal year 2027 to the commissioner of administration for office build-out, cost of space, office equipment, and other costs directly related to the establishment of the office. new text end ARTICLE 2 CONFORMING ITEMS AND REPEALERS Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 3.971, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 3b. new text end new text begin Public reports of fraud and misuse. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding the classification of data as not public, the legislative auditor must refer all credible reports from the public about potential fraud or misuse, as the terms are defined in chapter 15E, to the inspector general. The legislative auditor must coordinate reviews and investigations with the inspector general when coordination conserves resources and does not compromise the reviews or investigations. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 10A.01, subdivision 35, is amended to read: Subd. 35. Public official. "Public official" means any: (1) member of the legislature; (2) individual employed by the legislature as secretary of the senate, legislative auditor, director of the Legislative Budget Office, chief clerk of the house of representatives, revisor of statutes, or researcher, legislative analyst, fiscal analyst, or attorney in the Office of Senate Counsel, Research and Fiscal Analysis, House Research, or the House Fiscal Analysis Department; (3) constitutional officer in the executive branch and the officer's chief administrative deputy; (4) solicitor general or deputy, assistant, or special assistant attorney general; (5) commissioner, deputy commissioner, or assistant commissioner of any state department or agency as listed in section 15.01 or 15.06, or the state chief information officer; (6) member, chief administrative officer, or deputy chief administrative officer of a state board or commission that has either the power to adopt, amend, or repeal rules under chapter 14, or the power to adjudicate contested cases or appeals under chapter 14; (7) individual employed in the executive branch who is authorized to adopt, amend, or repeal rules under chapter 14 or adjudicate contested cases under chapter 14; (8) executive director of the State Board of Investment; (9) deputy of any official listed in clauses (7) and (8); (10) judge of the Workers' Compensation Court of Appeals; (11) administrative law judge or compensation judge in the State Office of Administrative Hearings or unemployment law judge in the Department of Employment and Economic Development; (12) member, regional administrator, division director, general counsel, or operations manager of the Metropolitan Council; (13) member or chief administrator of a metropolitan agency; (14) director of the Division of Alcohol and Gambling Enforcement in the Department of Public Safety; (15) member or executive director of the Health and Education Facilities Authority; (16) member of the board of directors or president of Enterprise Minnesota, Inc.; (17) member of the board of directors or executive director of the Minnesota State High School League; (18) member of the Minnesota Ballpark Authority established in section 473.755; (19) citizen member of the Legislative-Citizen Commission on Minnesota Resources; (20) manager of a watershed district, or member of a watershed management organization as defined under section 103B.205, subdivision 13; (21) supervisor of a soil and water conservation district; (22) director of Explore Minnesota Tourism; (23) citizen member of the Lessard-Sams Outdoor Heritage Council established in section 97A.056; (24) citizen member of the Clean Water Council established in section 114D.30; (25) member or chief executive of the Minnesota Sports Facilities Authority established in section 473J.07; (26) district court judge, appeals court judge, or supreme court justice; (27) county commissioner; (28) member of the Greater Minnesota Regional Parks and Trails Commission; (29) member of the Destination Medical Center Corporation established in section 469.41; deleted text begin ordeleted text end (30) chancellor or member of the Board of Trustees of the Minnesota State Colleges and Universitiesdeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; ornew text end new text begin (31) inspector general appointed under chapter 15E, or individual employed by the Office of the Inspector General. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 15A.0815, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Agency head salaries. The salary for a position listed in this subdivision shall be determined by the Compensation Council under section 15A.082. The commissioner of management and budget must publish the salaries on the department's website. This subdivision applies to the following positions: Commissioner of administration; Commissioner of agriculture; Commissioner of education; Commissioner of children, youth, and families; Commissioner of commerce; Commissioner of corrections; Commissioner of health; Commissioner, Minnesota Office of Higher Education; Commissioner, Minnesota IT Services; Commissioner, Housing Finance Agency; Commissioner of human rights; Commissioner of human services; Commissioner of labor and industry; Commissioner of management and budget; Commissioner of natural resources; Commissioner, Pollution Control Agency; Commissioner of public safety; Commissioner of revenue; Commissioner of employment and economic development; Commissioner of transportation; Commissioner of veterans affairs; Executive director of the Gambling Control Board; Executive director of the Minnesota State Lottery; Executive director of the Office of Cannabis Management; new text begin Inspector general; new text end Commissioner of Iron Range resources and rehabilitation; Commissioner, Bureau of Mediation Services; Ombudsman for mental health and developmental disabilities; Ombudsperson for corrections; Chair, Metropolitan Council; Chair, Metropolitan Airports Commission; School trust lands director; Executive director of pari-mutuel racing; Commissioner, Public Utilities Commission; Chief Executive Officer, Direct Care and Treatment; and Director of the Office of Emergency Medical Services. Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 127A.21, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Limits on receiving public funds; prohibition. new text end new text begin (a) This subdivision does not authorize any action that reduces, pauses, or otherwise interrupts state or federal aid to a school district; charter school; cooperative unit as defined in section 123A.24, subdivision 2; or any library, library system, or library district defined in section 134.001. new text end new text begin (b) For purposes of this subdivision, "program participant" includes individuals or persons who have an ownership interest in, control of, or the ability to control a program participant in a department program. new text end new text begin (c) If a program participant is excluded from a department program, the commissioner may: new text end new text begin (1) prohibit the excluded program participant from enrolling in, receiving grant money from, or registering in any other program administered by the commissioner; and new text end new text begin (2) disenroll or disqualify the excluded program participant from any other program administered by the commissioner. new text end new text begin (d) If a program participant enrolled, licensed, or receiving funds under any contract or program administered by a Minnesota state agency or federal agency is excluded from that program, the inspector general shall notify the commissioner who may: new text end new text begin (1) prohibit the excluded program participant from enrolling in, becoming licensed, receiving grant money from, or registering in any other program administered by the commissioner; and new text end new text begin (2) disenroll or disqualify the excluded program participant from any other program administered by the commissioner. new text end new text begin (e) The duration of a prohibition, disenrollment, revocation, suspension, or disqualification under paragraph (c) must last for the longest applicable sanction or disqualifying period in effect for the program participant permitted by state or federal law. The duration of a prohibition, disenrollment, revocation, suspension, or disqualification under paragraph (d) may last up until the longest applicable sanction or disqualifying period in effect for the program participant as permitted by state or federal law. new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 127A.21, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Notice. new text end new text begin Within five days of taking an action against a program participant under subdivision 8, paragraph (c) or (d), the commissioner must send notice of the action to the program participant. The notice must state the: new text end new text begin (1) basis for the action; new text end new text begin (2) effective date of the action; new text end new text begin (3) right to appeal the action; and new text end new text begin (4) requirements and procedures for reinstatement. new text end Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 127A.21, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 10. new text end new text begin Appeal. new text end new text begin (a) Upon receipt of a notice under subdivision 9, a program participant may request a contested case hearing, as defined in section 14.02, subdivision 3, by filing with the commissioner a written request of appeal. The appeal request must be received by the commissioner no later than 30 days after the date the notification was mailed to the program participant. new text end new text begin (b) The appeal request must specify: new text end new text begin (1) each disputed item and the reason for the dispute; new text end new text begin (2) the authority in statute or rule upon which the program participant relies for each disputed item; new text end new text begin (3) the name and address of the person or entity with whom contacts may be made regarding the appeal; and new text end new text begin (4) other information required by the commissioner. new text end new text begin (c) Unless a timely and proper appeal is received by the commissioner, the action of the commissioner shall be considered final and binding on the effective date of the action as stated in the notice under subdivision 9, clause (2). new text end Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 127A.21, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 11. new text end new text begin Withholding of payments. new text end new text begin (a) This subdivision does not authorize withholding of payments that reduces, pauses, or otherwise interrupts state or federal aid to a school district; charter school; cooperative unit as defined in section 123A.24, subdivision 2; or any library, library system, or library district defined in section 134.001. new text end new text begin (b) Except as otherwise provided by state or federal law, the inspector general shall notify and recommend to the commissioner to withhold payments to a program participant in any program administered by the commissioner, who shall have the authority to withhold such payments to the extent permitted under federal law, if the inspector general determines there is a credible allegation of fraud or misuse for which an investigation is pending for a program administered by the department, a Minnesota state agency, or a federal agency. new text end new text begin (c) Allegations are considered credible when they have indicia of reliability and the inspector general has reviewed the evidence and acts on a case-by-case basis. A credible allegation of fraud is an allegation that has been verified by the commissioner from any source, including but not limited to: new text end new text begin (1) fraud hotline complaints; new text end new text begin (2) claims data mining; and new text end new text begin (3) patterns identified through provider audits, civil false claims cases, and investigations. new text end new text begin (d) The commissioner must send notice of the withholding of payments within five days of taking such action. The notice must: new text end new text begin (1) state that payments are being withheld according to this paragraph; new text end new text begin (2) set forth the general allegations as to the reasons for the withholding action, but need not disclose any specific information concerning an ongoing investigation; new text end new text begin (3) state that the withholding is for a temporary period and cite the circumstances under which withholding will be terminated; and new text end new text begin (4) inform the program participant of the right to submit written evidence for consideration by the commissioner. new text end new text begin (e) The withholding of payments shall not continue after the inspector general determines there is insufficient evidence of fraud by the program participant or after legal proceedings relating to the alleged fraud are completed, unless the commissioner has sent notice under subdivision 5 of the intention to take an additional action related to the program participant's participation in a program administered by the commissioner. If the inspector general determines there is insufficient evidence of fraud by the program participant or after legal proceedings relating to the alleged fraud are completed, the inspector general shall notify the commissioner within ten days of the determination. new text end new text begin (f) The withholding of payments is a temporary action and shall not be subject to appeal under this subdivision or chapter 14. new text end Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 127A.21, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 12. new text end new text begin Office of the Inspector General; reports. new text end new text begin The commissioner must submit final investigative reports to the inspector general, serving under chapter 15E, for any investigation conducted by the commissioner into fraud or misuse, as the terms are defined in section 15E.15, within a program administered by the commissioner. new text end Sec. 9. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142A.03, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 36. new text end new text begin Office of the Inspector General; reports. new text end new text begin The commissioner must submit final investigative reports to the inspector general, serving under chapter 15E, for any investigation conducted by the commissioner into fraud or misuse, as the terms are defined in section 15E.15, within the child care assistance program. new text end Sec. 10. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142A.12, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Withholding of payments. (a) Except as otherwise provided by state or federal law, the commissioner may withhold payments to a provider, vendor, individual, associated individual, or associated entity in any program administered by the commissioner if the commissioner determines there is a credible allegation of fraud for which an investigation is pending for a program administered by a Minnesota state or federal agency. (b) For purposes of this subdivision, "credible allegation of fraud" means an allegation that has been verified by the commissioner from any source, including but not limited to: (1) fraud hotline complaints; (2) claims data mining; (3) patterns identified through provider audits, civil false claims cases, and law enforcement investigations; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (4) court filings and other legal documents, including but not limited to police reports, complaints, indictments, informations, affidavits, declarations, and search warrantsdeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (5) information from the inspector general, including information listed on the inspector general's exclusion list under section 15E.25, subdivision 1, clause (13). new text end (c) The commissioner must send notice of the withholding of payments within five days of taking such action. The notice must: (1) state that payments are being withheld according to this subdivision; (2) set forth the general allegations related to the withholding action, except the notice need not disclose specific information concerning an ongoing investigation; (3) state that the withholding is for a temporary period and cite the circumstances under which the withholding will be terminated; and (4) inform the provider, vendor, individual, associated individual, or associated entity of the right to submit written evidence to contest the withholding action for consideration by the commissioner. (d) If the commissioner withholds payments under this subdivision, the provider, vendor, individual, associated individual, or associated entity has a right to request administrative reconsideration. A request for administrative reconsideration must be made in writing, state with specificity the reasons the payment withholding decision is in error, and include documents to support the request. Within 60 days from receipt of the request, the commissioner shall judiciously review allegations, facts, evidence available to the commissioner, and information submitted by the provider, vendor, individual, associated individual, or associated entity to determine whether the payment withholding should remain in place. (e) The commissioner shall stop withholding payments if the commissioner determines there is insufficient evidence of fraud by the provider, vendor, individual, associated individual, or associated entity or when legal proceedings relating to the alleged fraud are completed, unless the commissioner has sent notice under subdivision 3 to the provider, vendor, individual, associated individual, or associated entity. (f) The withholding of payments is a temporary action and is not subject to appeal under section 256.0451 or chapter 14. Sec. 11. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 144.05, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Office of the Inspector General; reports. new text end new text begin The commissioner must submit final investigative reports to the inspector general serving under chapter 15E for any investigation conducted by the commissioner into fraud or misuse, as the terms are defined in section 15E.15, within the special supplemental nutrition program for women, infants, and children. new text end Sec. 12. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 245.095, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Withholding of payments. (a) Except as otherwise provided by state or federal law, the commissioner may withhold payments to a provider, vendor, individual, associated individual, or associated entity in any program administered by the commissioner if the commissioner determines there is a credible allegation of fraud for which an investigation is pending for a program administered by a Minnesota state or federal agency. (b) For purposes of this subdivision, "credible allegation of fraud" means an allegation that has been verified by the commissioner from any source, including but not limited to: (1) fraud hotline complaints; (2) claims data mining; (3) patterns identified through provider audits, civil false claims cases, and law enforcement investigations; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (4) court filings and other legal documents, including but not limited to police reports, complaints, indictments, informations, affidavits, declarations, and search warrantsdeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (5) information from the inspector general, including information listed on the inspector general's exclusion list under section 15E.25, subdivision 1, clause (13) new text end (c) The commissioner must send notice of the withholding of payments within five days of taking such action. The notice must: (1) state that payments are being withheld according to this subdivision; (2) set forth the general allegations related to the withholding action, except the notice need not disclose specific information concerning an ongoing investigation; (3) state that the withholding is for a temporary period and cite the circumstances under which the withholding will be terminated; and (4) inform the provider, vendor, individual, associated individual, or associated entity of the right to submit written evidence to contest the withholding action for consideration by the commissioner. (d) If the commissioner withholds payments under this subdivision, the provider, vendor, individual, associated individual, or associated entity has a right to request administrative reconsideration. A request for administrative reconsideration must be made in writing, state with specificity the reasons the payment withholding decision is in error, and include documents to support the request. Within 60 days from receipt of the request, the commissioner shall judiciously review allegations, facts, evidence available to the commissioner, and information submitted by the provider, vendor, individual, associated individual, or associated entity to determine whether the payment withholding should remain in place. (e) The commissioner shall stop withholding payments if the commissioner determines there is insufficient evidence of fraud by the provider, vendor, individual, associated individual, or associated entity or when legal proceedings relating to the alleged fraud are completed, unless the commissioner has sent notice under subdivision 3 to the provider, vendor, individual, associated individual, or associated entity. (f) The withholding of payments is a temporary action and is not subject to appeal under section 256.045 or chapter 14. Sec. 13. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256.01, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 45. new text end new text begin Office of the Inspector General; reports. new text end new text begin The commissioner must submit final investigative reports to the inspector general, serving under chapter 15E, for any investigation conducted by the commissioner into fraud or misuse, as the terms are defined in section 15E.15, within the Medicaid program. new text end Sec. 14. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.456, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Legislative auditornew text begin and inspector generalnew text end . Whenever an employee or officer of the state, University of Minnesota, or other organization listed in section 3.971, subdivision 6, discovers evidence of new text begin fraud, new text end theft, embezzlement, or new text begin other new text end unlawful use of public funds or property, the employee or officer shalldeleted text begin , except when to do so would knowingly impede or otherwise interfere with an ongoing criminal investigation,deleted text end promptly report in writing to the legislative auditornew text begin or inspector generalnew text end a detailed description of the alleged incident or incidents.